pt-PT: Aplicação de alfinetes retos: Aplique; Bloqueio (tricô/croché); Trabalhos manuais; Corte e costura; Arranjo floral; Costura geral; Uso em escritório/quadro de avisos; Acolchoamento; Outro
pl: Zastosowanie szpilki: Aplikacja; Blokowanie (dziewiarstwo/szydełkowanie); Rękodzieło; Krawiectwo; Florystyka; Szycie ogólnego przeznaczenia; Biuro/tablice korkowe; Pikowanie; Inne
de: Verwendungszweck von Stecknadeln: Applikation; Spannen (Stricken/Häkeln); Basteln; Schneiderei; Blumenarrangements; Allzwecknähen; Büro/Pinnwand; Quilten; Andere
el: Χρήση ίσιας καρφίτσας: Απλικέ; Τέντωμα (πλέξιμο/βελονάκι); Χειροτεχνία; Ραπτική; Ανθοδετική; Ράψιμο γενικής χρήσης; Χρήση σε γραφείο/πίνακα ανακοινώσεων; Καπιτονέ; Άλλο
it: Applicazione degli spilli dritti: Appliqué; Messa in forma (maglia/uncinetto); Bricolage; Sartoria; Composizioni floreali; Cucito per uso generale; Uso per ufficio/bacheca; Trapuntatura; Altro
pt-BR: Alfinete reto aplicação: Aplique; Blocagem (tricô/crochê); Artesanato; Costura de roupas; Arranjo floral; Costura de uso geral; Uso em escritório/quadro de avisos; Quilting; Outro
ja: ストレートピン用途: アップリケ; ブロッキング (編み物/かぎ針編み); クラフト; 洋裁; フラワーアレンジメント; 汎用裁縫; オフィス/掲示板用; キルティング; その他
vi: Ứng dụng ghim thẳng: Appliqué; Kéo căng định hình (đan/móc); Thủ công; May mặc; Cắm hoa; May vá đa dụng; Dùng cho văn phòng/bảng tin; Chần gòn; Khác
sv: Raknål – applicering: Applikation; Blockning (stickning/virkning); Pyssel; Skrädderi; Blomsterarrangemang; Allmän sömnad; Användning på kontor/anslagstavla; Quiltning; Övrigt
es: Aplicación del alfiler recto: Aplicación; Bloqueo (tejido/crochet); Manualidades; Confección; Arreglos florales; Costura general; Uso en oficina/tablero de anuncios; Acolchado; Otro
lt-LT: Tiesių smeigtukų paskirtis: Aplikacija; Formavimas (mezgimas / nėrimas); Rankdarbiai; Drabužių siuvimas; Gėlių komponavimas; Bendrosios paskirties siuvimas; Biurui / skelbimų lentoms; Dygsniavimas; Kita
nb: Bruk av rett nål: Applikasjon; Blokking (strikking/hekling); Hobbyarbeid; Klessøm; Blomsterbinding; Generell søm; Kontor / oppslagstavle; Quilting; Annet
nl: Rechte speld toepassing: Applicatie; Opspannen (breien/haken); Knutselen; Kleding maken; Bloemschikken; Naaien (algemeen gebruik); Kantoor/prikbord; Quilten; Overig
ro-RO: Aplicație a acelor cu gămălie: Aplice; Blocare (tricotat/croșetat); Lucru manual; Croitorie; Aranjamente florale; Cusut de uz general; Utilizare la birou/panou de anunțuri; Matlasare; Altele
sl-SI: Uporaba bucik: Aplikacija; Napenjanje (pletenje/kvačkanje); Ustvarjanje; Krojaštvo; Cvetličarstvo; Splošno šivanje; Pisarna/oglasna deska; Prešivanje; Drugo
tr: Düz iğne kullanım alanı: Aplike; Bloklama (örgü/tığ işi); El sanatları; Elbise dikimi; Çiçek aranjmanı; Genel amaçlı dikiş; Ofis/ilan panosu kullanımı; Kapitone; Diğer
en: Straight pin application: Appliqué; Blocking (knitting/crochet); Crafting; Dressmaking; Floral arranging; General purpose sewing; Office/bulletin board use; Quilting; Other
zh-CN: 大头针用途: 贴布绣; 定型（针织/钩织）; 手工; 服装制作; 插花; 通用缝纫; 办公/公告栏用途; 绗缝; 其他
sk-SK: Použitie rovného špendlíka: Aplikácie; Blokovanie (pletenie/háčkovanie); Ručné práce; Krajčírstvo; Aranžovanie kvetov; Všeobecné šitie; Kancelária/nástenky; Quilting; Iné
ru: Назначение прямых булавок: Аппликация; Блокировка (вязание спицами/крючком); Рукоделие; Пошив одежды; Флористика; Шитье общего назначения; Использование в офисе/на досках объявлений; Квилтинг; Другое
th: การใช้งานเข็มหมุดตรง: งานปะติด; บล็อกกิ้ง (นิตติ้ง/โครเชต์); งานฝีมือ; การตัดเย็บเสื้อผ้า; การจัดดอกไม้; การเย็บผ้าอเนกประสงค์; ใช้งานในสำนักงาน/บนบอร์ดประกาศ; ควิลท์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 大頭針應用: 貼花; 定型 (棒針/鉤針); 手工藝; 洋裁; 花藝設計; 一般縫紉; 辦公室/佈告欄使用; 絎縫; 其他
ko: 스트레이트 핀 용도: 아플리케; 블로킹(뜨개질/코바늘); 공예; 양재; 꽃꽂이; 일반 재봉; 사무실/게시판용; 퀼팅; 기타
bg-BG: Предназначение на правите карфици: Апликация; Блокиране (плетене); Занаяти; Шивашки услуги; Аранжиране на цветя; Шиене с общо предназначение; За офис/коркова дъска; Капитониране; Друго
cs: Použití přímých kolíků: Aplikace; Vypínání (pletení/háčkování); Tvoření; Krejčovství; Aranžování květin; Univerzální šití; Do kanceláře / na nástěnku; Quiltování; Jiné
fr: Usage des épingles droites: Appliqué; Blocage (tricot/crochet); Artisanat; Couture; Composition florale; Couture générale; Usage de bureau/tableau d'affichage; Matelassage; Autre
hu: Gombostű felhasználási területe: Applikáció; Kifeszítés (kötés/horgolás); Kézművesség; Ruhakészítés; Virágrendezés; Általános célú varrás; Irodai/faliújság használat; Foltvarrás; Egyéb
da: Anvendelse for knappenål: Applikation; Udspænding (strik/hækling); Hobby/håndarbejde; Tøjsyning; Blomsterdekoration; Almindelig syning; Kontor/opslagstavle; Quiltning; Andet
hr-HR: Straight prikačeno aplikacija: Aplikacija; Blokiranje (pletenje/heklanje); Izrada rukotvorina; Krojenje; Cvjećarstvo; Šivanje opće namjene; Za ured / oglasnu ploču; Prošivanje (quilting); Ostalo
fi: Nuppineulojen käyttö: Applikointi; Pingotus (neulonta/virkkaus); Askartelu; Vaatteiden ompelu; Kukkien asettelu; Yleisompelu; Toimisto-/ilmoitustaulukäyttö; Tikkaus; Muu